Utah statutes.
34A-1-305.   Orders of commission -- Presumed lawful.

All orders of the commission within its jurisdiction shall be presumed reasonable and lawful until they are found otherwise in an action brought for that purpose, or until altered or revoked by the commission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

